Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6152.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 320a. (1) Within Not later than 5 days after receipt of a properly prepared abstract from a court of this state or another state, the secretary of state shall record the date of conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition, and the number of points for each, based on the following formula, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 except as otherwise provided in this section and section 629c: (a) Manslaughter, negligent homicide, or a felony resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, ORV, or snowmobile 6 points (b) A violation of section 601b(2) or (3), 601c(1) or (2), or 653a(3) or (4) or, beginning October 31, 2010, a violation of section 601d 6 points (c) A violation of section 625(1), (4), (5), (7), or (8), section 81134 or 82127(1) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81134 and 324.82127, or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625(1), (4), (5), (7), or (8), or section 81134 or 82127(1) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81134 and 324.82127 6 points (d) Failing to stop and disclose identity at the scene of an accident when required by law 6 points (e) Operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 626 6 points (f) Fleeing or eluding an officer 6 points (g) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to speed in a work zone described in that section by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 15 miles per hour 5 points (h) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 15 miles per hour 4 points 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (i) A violation of section 625(3) or (6), section 82127(3) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82127, or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625(3) or (6) or section 82127(3) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82127 4 points (j) A violation of section 626a or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 626a 4 points (k) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to speed in a work zone described in that section by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 10 but not more than 15 miles per hour 4 points (l) Beginning October 31, 2010, a moving violation resulting in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an individual, or any other object 4 points (m) Careless driving in violation of section 626b or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 626b 3 points (n) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 10 miles per hour but not more than 15 miles per hour 3 points (o) A violation of section 653a(2) 2 points (p) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 5 miles per hour but not more than 10 miles per hour 2 points (q) A violation of any law or ordinance pertaining to speed by exceeding the lawful maximum by more than 1 mile per hour but not more than 5 miles per hour 1 point 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (r) Disobeying a traffic signal or stop sign, or improper passing 3 points (s) A violation of section 624a, 624b, or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 624a or 624b 2 points (t) A violation of section 310e(4) or (6) or a law or ordinance substantially corresponding to section 310e(4) or (6) 2 points (u) All other moving violations pertaining to the operation of motor vehicles reported under this section 2 points (v) A refusal by an individual less than 21 years of age to submit to a preliminary breath test required by a peace officer under section 625a 2 points (w) A violation of section 627(6) pertaining to speed in a work zone described in that section by exceeding the lawful maximum by 10 miles per hour or less 3 points (x) A third or subsequent violation of section 602b 2 points (y) A second violation of section 602b 1 point (2) Points must not be entered for a violation of section 310e(14), 311, 602c, 625m, 658, 707c, 710d, 717, 719, 719a, or 723. (3) Points must not be entered for bond forfeitures. (4) Points must not be entered for overweight loads or for defective equipment. (5) If more than 1 conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition results from the same incident, points must be entered only for the violation that receives the highest number of points under this section. (6) If an individual has accumulated 9 points as provided in this section, the secretary of state may call the individual in for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 an interview as to the individual's driving ability and record after due notice as to time and place of the interview. If the individual fails to appear as provided in this subsection, the secretary of state shall add 3 points to the individual's record. (7) If an individual violates a speed restriction established by an executive order issued during a state of energy emergency as provided by 1982 PA 191, MCL 10.81 to 10.89, the secretary of state shall enter points for the violation under subsection (1). (8) The secretary of state shall enter 6 points upon on the record of an individual whose license is suspended or denied under section 625f. However, if a conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition results from the same incident, additional points for that offense must not be entered. (9) If a Michigan driver commits a violation in another state that would be a civil infraction if committed in this state, and a conviction results solely because of the failure of the Michigan driver to appear in that state to contest the violation, upon on receipt of the abstract of conviction by the secretary of state, the violation must be noted on the Michigan driver's record, but points must not be assessed against the Michigan driver license. Sec. 707b. (1) A motor vehicle, while being operated on a highway or street, shall must be equipped with an exhaust system in good working order to prevent excessive or unusual noise. and shall be equipped to prevent noise in excess of the limits established in this act. (2) For purposes of sections 707a to 707f, a motor vehicle does not include a special mobile equipment. Sec. 707c. (1) A motor vehicle must not be operated or driven on a highway or street if the motor vehicle produces total noise 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 exceeding 1 of the following limits at a distance of 50 feet except as provided in subdivisions (b)(iii) and (c)(iii): (a) A motor vehicle with a gross weight or gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or more, combination vehicle with gross weight or gross vehicle weight ratings of 8,500 pounds or more: . (i) Ninety DBA if the maximum lawful speed on the highway or street is greater than 35 miles per hour. (ii) Eighty-six DBA if the maximum lawful speed on the highway or street is not more than 35 miles per hour. (iii) Eighty-eight DBA under stationary run-up test. (b) A motorcycle or a moped: (i) Eighty-six DBA if the maximum lawful speed on the highway or street is greater than 35 miles per hour. (ii) Eighty-two DBA if the maximum lawful speed on the highway or street is not more than 35 miles per hour. (iii) Ninety-five DBA under stationary run-up test at 75 inches. (c) A motor vehicle or a combination of vehicles towed by a motor vehicle not covered in subdivision (a) or (b): (i) Eighty-two DBA if the maximum lawful speed on the highway or street is greater than 35 miles per hour. (ii) Seventy-six DBA if the maximum lawful speed on the highway or street is not more than 35 miles per hour. (iii) Ninety-five DBA under stationary run-up test 20 inches from the end of the tailpipe. (2) A dealer shall not sell or offer for sale for use upon on a street or highway in this state a new motor vehicle that produces a maximum noise exceeding the following limits: (a) A motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 8,500 pounds or moreâ83 DBA. (b) A motorcycle or a mopedâ83 DBA. (c) A motor vehicle not covered in subdivision (a) or (b)â80 DBA. (3) A person shall not operate a vehicle on a highway or street if the vehicle has a defect in the exhaust system that affects sound reduction , or is not equipped with a muffler or other noise dissipative device. , or (4) A person shall not operate a vehicle on a highway or street if the vehicle's exhaust system is equipped with a cutout, bypass, amplifier, or a similar device. (5) (4) A person, either acting for himself or herself the person or as the agent or employee of another, shall not sell, install, or replace a muffler or exhaust part that causes the motor vehicle to which the muffler or exhaust part is attached to exceed the noise limits established by this act or a rule promulgated under this act. (5) A person shall not modify, repair, replace, or remove a part of an exhaust system causing the motor vehicle to which the system is attached to produce noise in excess of the levels established by this act, or operate a motor vehicle so altered on a street or highway. (6) A dealer shall not sell a used or secondhand motor vehicle for use upon on a street or highway that is not in compliance with this act. (7) A person who violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction and shall be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days 1 2 3 4 5 after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03318'25) or House Bill No. 6151 (request no. H03318'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.